Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.750

Zoning—Types of regulations.

Any board, by ordinance, may establish classifications, within each of which, specific controls are identified, and which will regulate:

(1) The use of buildings, structures, and land as between agriculture, industry, business, residence, and other purposes;

(2) The location, height, bulk, number of stories, and size of buildings and structures; the size of yards, courts, and other open spaces; the density of population; the percentage of a lot which may be occupied by buildings and structures; and the area required to provide off-street facilities for the parking of motor vehicles; and

(3) The minimum gross floor area requirements for single-family detached dwellings, including the elimination of such requirements or reduction of such requirements below the minimum performance standards and objectives contained in the state building code.

[ 2018 c 302 s 6; 1963 c 4 s 36.70.750. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 75.]